src/noun-sme-lex.txt
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! ========================================================================== !
!                     North Sámi noun lexicon                                !
! ========================================================================== !



LEXICON NounRoot
 Noun ;
 FirstComponent ;
 HyphNouns ;

LEXICON MiddleNouns
alde+ShCmp+Use/LexSub:al           Rreal ; 
beaivi+ShCmp:beai               Rnoun ;
bealli+ShCmp:beal               Rreal ;
bálda+ShCmp+Use/LexSub:báldd     Rreal ; 
gabba+ShCmp+Use/LexSub:gabb	   Rreal ; 
garra+ShCmp+Use/LexSub:garr	   Rreal ; 
gaska+ShCmp+Use/LexSub:gask	   Rreal ; 
geaidnu+ShCmp+Use/LexSub:geaj       Rreal ; 
geahči+ShCmp:geaš               Rreal ;
giehta+ShCmp+Use/LexSub:gieh       Rreal ; 
giehta+ShCmp+Use/LexSub:giet       Rnoun ; 
guoddá+ShCmp+Use/LexSub:guodd     Rreal ; 
guoika+ShCmp+Use/LexSub:guoih     Rreal ; 
guoika+ShCmp+Use/LexSub:guoikk   Rreal ; 
johka+ShCmp+Use/LexSub:joh         Rreal ; 
johka+ShCmp+Use/LexSub:jot         Rnoun ;
liigi+ShCmp+Use/LexSub:liig	   Rreal ; 
mielde+ShCmp:miel               Rreal ; ! From Rnoun, to avoid miel = ShCmp
miessi+ShCmp+Use/LexSub:mies	   Rnoun ; 
muorra+ShCmp+Use/LexSub:muorr     Rreal ; 
niibi+ShCmp+Use/LexSub:niib9	   Rreal ; 
njunni+ShCmp+Use/LexSub:njun       Rnoun ; 
njárga+ShCmp+Use/LexSub:njár	   Rreal ; 
námmi+ShCmp+Use/LexSub:námm	   Rreal ; 
oahpaheaddji+ShCmp:oahpaheai     Rnoun ;
oaivi+ShCmp+Use/LexSub:oai 	       Rnoun ; 
oaivi+ShCmp+Use/LexSub:oaiv	   Rreal ; 
rista+ShCmp+Use/LexSub:ris	       Rreal ; 
sadji+ShCmp+Use/LexSub:sai         Rreal ; 
siski+ShCmp+Use/LexSub:sis         Rreal ; ! From Rnoun to avoid sis = ShCmp
sáttu+ShCmp+Use/LexSub:sáh         Rreal ; 
sáttu+ShCmp+Use/LexSub:sát         Rnoun ; 
vuohppa+ShCmp+Use/LexSub:vuohpp   Rreal ; 
vuolli+ShCmp:vuol               Rreal ;
vággi+ShCmp+Use/LexSub:váh         Rreal ; 
várri+ShCmp+Use/LexSub:vár         Rreal ; 
vággi+ShCmp+Use/LexSub:vát         Rnoun ; 
čibbi+ShCmp+Use/LexSub:čip	       Rreal ; 
šlubbu+ShCmp+Use/LexSub:šlubb     Rreal ; 
čáhci+ShCmp+Use/LexSub:čáz	       Rreal ; 

LEXICON NonFirstNouns
! some stray affixes, look at these
! Trying them without the initial hyphen
bealis+CmpN/Last+CmpN/Only+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:beallis LASIS ;
giel+CmpN/Last+CmpN/Only+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:giel At ;
miesebeaska+CmpN/Last:miese#beas'ka GOAHTI-A ;
nammasaš+CmpN/Last+CmpN/Only+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:nammas AHKASAS ;
niehkki+CmpN/Last+CmpN/Only:niehkki AIGI ;
sahán+CmpN/Last+CmpN/Only:sahám BOAHTIN ;
čorgi+CmpN/Last+CmpN/Only+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Time:čor'gi GOAHTI-I ;

LEXICON Noun
miella+N+Sg+Gen+Use/-Spell:miela MiddleNouns ;
